Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1029.
do enact as follows:AB1029,11Section 1. 20.913 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1029,3,4220.913 (1) (b) Excess tax payments. Taxes collected in excess of lawful 1taxation, when claims therefor have been established as provided in ss. 71.30 (4), 271.74 (13), 71.75, 71.89 (1), 72.24 72.43 (5), 74.35, 74.37, 76.13 (3), 76.39, 76.84, 378.19, 78.68 (10), 78.75, 78.80 (1m), 139.092, 139.25 (1), 139.36, 139.365 and 139.39 4(4).AB1029,25Section 2. 71.14 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1029,3,13671.14 (2) A trust created at death by will, contract, declaration of trust or 7implication of law by a decedent who at the time of death was a resident of this state 8shall be considered resident at the domicile of the decedent at the time of the 9decedent’s death until transferred by the court having jurisdiction under s. 72.27 1072.49 to another court’s jurisdiction. After jurisdiction is transferred, the trust 11shall be considered resident at the place to which jurisdiction is transferred. The 12hearing to transfer jurisdiction shall be held only after giving written notice to the 13department of revenue under s. 879.05.AB1029,314Section 3. 71.93 (7) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1029,3,191571.93 (7) Exchange of information. Information relative to changes to any 16debt certified shall be exchanged promptly by each agency. Setoff of refunds and 17reduction of disbursements against debts certified by agencies, and any report of 18the setoff or reduction to state agencies, is not a violation of ss. 71.78, 72.06 72.51, 1977.61 (5), 78.80 (3), and 139.38 (6).AB1029,420Section 4. 71.93 (8) (b) 5. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1029,4,22171.93 (8) (b) 5. The department may collect debts and assess interest on 22delinquent amounts under this paragraph in the same manner that it collects taxes 23and assesses interest under ss. 71.82 (2), 71.91, 71.92, and 73.03 (20). The 24department’s use of tax returns and related information to collect debts under this 1paragraph is not a violation of s. 71.78, 72.06 72.51, 77.61 (5), 78.80 (3), or 139.38 2(6).AB1029,53Section 5. Chapter 72 of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:AB1029,4,54CHAPTER 725ESTATE TAXAB1029,4,6672.40 Definitions. In this chapter:AB1029,4,97(1) “Death tax” means an estate, inheritance, succession, legacy, or transfer 8tax that is imposed by another state, a territory, or the District of Columbia because 9of death or in contemplation of death.AB1029,4,1010(2) “Department” means the department of revenue.AB1029,4,1311(3) “Distributee” means a person to whom property is transferred by reason of 12the death, or in contemplation of the death, of a decedent, other than in payment of 13a claim.AB1029,4,1514(4) “Estate” means all property of a decedent transferred by reason of the 15decedent’s death or in contemplation of the decedent’s death.AB1029,4,1716(5) “Federal estate tax” means the tax imposed under ch. 11 of the Internal 17Revenue Code.AB1029,4,1918(6) “Personal representative” means a person to whom a court has granted 19letters to administer a decedent’s estate.AB1029,4,2020(7) “Situs” means any of the following:AB1029,4,2221(a) With respect to real property, the state or country in which the property is 22located.AB1029,5,323(b) With respect to tangible personal property, the state or country in which 24the property is normally kept or located at the time of a decedent’s death or, in the 1case of a gift of tangible personal property made within 3 years of death, the state or 2country in which the property is normally kept or located at the time the gift is 3made.AB1029,5,74(c) With respect to intangible personal property, the state or country in which 5the decedent is domiciled at the time of death or, in the case of a gift of intangible 6personal property made within 3 years of death, the state or country in which the 7decedent is domiciled at the time the gift is made.AB1029,5,118(d) Notwithstanding pars. (a) and (b), if a nonresident decedent has an 9ownership interest in a pass-through entity that owns real or tangible personal 10property, the situs of the property is determined as if the property is personally 11owned by the decedent and the pass-through entity does not exist.AB1029,5,1512(8) “Wisconsin gross estate” means the decedent’s gross estate, as defined in 13section 2031 of the Internal Revenue Code and as required to be determined and 14valued for federal estate tax purposes, but excluding any property with a situs 15outside this state.AB1029,5,191672.41 Estate tax imposed. (1) Tax imposed. An estate tax is imposed on 17the following transfers of property that is subject to the federal estate tax, 18regardless of whether the federal estate tax is imposed, and that has a taxable situs 19in this state: AB1029,5,2020(a) The transfer is from a decedent who dies while a resident of this state.AB1029,6,221(b) The transfer is from a decedent who dies while not a resident of this state 22and the property is within the jurisdiction of this state, except that a transfer of a 23nonresident decedent’s intangible personal property is not subject to tax if, at the 24time of the death, the state of the decedent’s residence allows a like exemption for 1intangible personal property in favor of this state’s residents or does not impose a 2death tax.AB1029,6,63(2) Taxable estate. The tax imposed under sub. (1) is equal to the value of 4the Wisconsin taxable estate multiplied by the rate applicable under sub. (3). The 5value of the Wisconsin taxable estate shall be equal to the value of the Wisconsin 6gross estate with the following modifications:AB1029,6,117(a) Decreased by the deductions allowed to the estate under sections 2053, 82054, 2055, and 2056 of the Internal Revenue Code, regardless of whether the 9estate makes the deductions for federal tax purposes. No amount may be deducted 10under this paragraph for foreign taxes under section 2053 (d) of the Internal 11Revenue Code.AB1029,6,1212(b) Decreased by the exclusion provided under s. 72.42.AB1029,6,1413(3) Rate of tax. (a) Subject to par. (b), the value of the Wisconsin taxable 14estate, as determined under sub. (2), shall be taxed at the following rates:AB1029,6,17151. For any amount that is less than one-third of the applicable exclusion 16amount determined in the taxable year under section 2010 (c) (2) of the Internal 17Revenue Code, the rate is 0.AB1029,6,21182. For any amount that is at least one-third, but less than two-thirds, of the 19applicable exclusion amount determined in the taxable year under section 2010 (c) 20(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, the rate is equal to one-sixth of the highest 21marginal rate under section 2001 (c) of the Internal Revenue Code.AB1029,7,2223. For any amount that is at least two-thirds of, but less than, the applicable 23exclusion amount determined in the taxable year under section 2010 (c) (2) of the 1Internal Revenue Code, the rate is equal to one-third of the highest marginal rate 2under section 2001 (c) of the Internal Revenue Code.AB1029,7,634. For any amount that is at least equal to the applicable exclusion amount 4determined in the taxable year under section 2010 (c) (2) of the Internal Revenue 5Code, the rate is equal to one-half of the highest marginal rate under section 2001 6(c) of the Internal Revenue Code.AB1029,7,137(b) If, in a taxable year, the basic exclusion amount in section 2010 (c) (3) (A) 8of the Internal Revenue Code is less than $15,000,000, or if section 2010 (c) (2) or (3) 9of the Internal Revenue Code is repealed or made inoperable, the applicable 10exclusion amount in par. (a) 1., 2., 3., and 4. shall be determined using the basic 11exclusion amount in section 2010 (c) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code that applies 12for federal estate tax purposes in the taxable year immediately prior to the 13reduction, repeal, or inoperability. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1029 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1029 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1029 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1029 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1029: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting